Tennessee, session 114, SB1671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-826(b), is amended by deleting
"thirty (30)" and substituting "forty-five (45)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1671
010713
- 1 -